California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) The department shall issue a notice of intent to issue an order of compliance not less than 30 days before the department holds a hearing to issue the notice of compliance. The notice of intent shall specify all of the following:

(A) The proposed basis for issuing an order of compliance.

(B) The proposed actions the department recommends are necessary for the jurisdiction to complete the implementation of its source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element.

(C) The proposed recommendations to
 the department.

(3) The department shall consider any information provided pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41821, if the proposed issuance of an order of compliance involves changes to a jurisdiction’s calculation of annual disposal.

(d) (1) If, after holding a public hearing, which, to the extent possible, shall be held in the local or regional agency’s jurisdiction, the department finds that a jurisdiction has failed to make a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element, the department shall issue an order of compliance with a specific schedule for achieving compliance.

(2) The compliance order shall include those conditions that the department determines to be necessary for the jurisdiction to implement its
 diversion programs.

(3) In addition to considering the good faith efforts of a jurisdiction, as specified in subdivision (e), to implement a diversion program, the department shall consider all of the following factors in determining whether or not to issue a compliance order:

(A) Whether an exceptional growth rate may have affected compliance.

(B) Other information that the jurisdiction may provide that indicates the effectiveness of the jurisdiction’s programs, such as disposal characterization studies or other jurisdiction specific information.

(e) For purposes of making a determination pursuant to this section as to whether a jurisdiction has failed to make a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household
 hazardous waste element, the department shall consider all of the following criteria:

(1) For the purposes of this section, “good faith effort” means all reasonable and feasible efforts by a jurisdiction to implement those programs or activities identified in its source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element, or alternative programs or activities that achieve the same or similar results.

(2) For purposes of this section, “good faith effort” may also include the evaluation by a jurisdiction of improved technology for the handling and management of solid waste that would reduce costs, improve efficiency in the collection, processing, or marketing of recyclable materials or yard waste, and enhance the ability of the jurisdiction to adequately address all sources of significant disposal, the submission by the jurisdiction of a compliance schedule, and the
 undertaking of all other reasonable and feasible efforts to implement the programs identified in the jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element.

(3) In determining whether a jurisdiction has made a good faith effort, the department shall also consider the enforcement criteria included in its enforcement policy, as adopted on April 25, 1995, or as subsequently amended.

(4) The department shall consider all of the following when considering whether a jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element:

(A) Natural disasters.

(B) Budgetary conditions within a jurisdiction that could not be remedied by the imposition or
 adjustment of solid waste fees.

(C) Work stoppages that directly prevent a jurisdiction from implementing its source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element.

(D) The impact of the failure of federal, state, and other local agencies located within the jurisdiction to implement source reduction and recycling programs in the jurisdiction.

(E) The extent to which the jurisdiction has implemented additional source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(F) The extent to which the jurisdiction has made program implementation choices driven by considerations related to other environmental issues, including climate change.

(G) Whether the jurisdiction has
 provided information to the department concerning whether construction and demolition waste material is at least a moderately significant portion of the waste stream, and, if so, whether the local jurisdiction has adopted an ordinance for diversion of construction and demolition waste materials from solid waste disposal facilities, has adopted a model ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42912 for diversion of construction and demolition waste materials from solid waste disposal facilities, or has implemented another program to encourage or require diversion of construction and demolition waste materials from solid waste disposal facilities.

(H) The extent to which the jurisdiction has implemented programs to comply with Section 41780 and to maintain its per capita disposal rate.

(I) Whether the jurisdiction has implemented a dual stream recycling program. For this
 purpose, “dual stream recycling program” means a program in which fiber materials to be collected for recycling is required to be separated from containers or from glass. A dual stream recycling program includes, but is not limited to, split cart collection, separate collection containers for fiber and containers, or alternating collection weeks for single collection containers containing only fiber or only containers.

(5) In making a determination whether a jurisdiction has made a good faith effort, pursuant to this section, the department may consider a jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate as a factor in determining whether the jurisdiction adequately implemented its diversion programs. The department shall not consider a jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate to be determinative as to whether the jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste
 element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   (AB 2902)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement and Penalties [41850. - 41851.]

41850.

(a) Except as specifically provided in Section 41813, if, after holding the public hearing and issuing an order of compliance pursuant to Section 41825, the board finds that the jurisdiction has failed to make a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element, the board may impose administrative civil penalties upon the city or county or, pursuant to Section 40974, upon the city or county as a member of a regional agency, of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the jurisdiction implements the element.

(b) In determining whether or not to impose any penalties, or in determining the amount of any penalties imposed under this section, including any penalties imposed due to the exclusion of solid waste pursuant to Section 41781.2 that results in a reduction in the quantity of solid waste diverted by a jurisdiction, the board shall consider whether the jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element. In addition, the board shall consider only those relevant circumstances that have prevented a jurisdiction from meeting the requirements of this division, including, but not limited to, the factors described in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 41825.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 343, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

41850.5.

Any administrative civil penalty imposed by the board pursuant to Section 41813 or 48150 shall be deposited in the Local Government Assistance Account, which is hereby created in the Integrated Waste Management Fund. Any funds deposited in that account shall be used solely for the purposes of assisting local governments in complying with the diversion requirements established under Section 41780, and shall not be used by the board for administrative purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41851.

Nothing in this chapter shall infringe on the existing authority of counties and cities to control land use or to make land use decisions, and nothing in this chapter provides or transfers new authority over that land use to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Local Fee Authority [41900. - 41904.]

41900.

Each city and county shall demonstrate a funding source, or sources, available to pay for preparing, adopting, and implementing the element or plan, as required by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 49.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41901.

A city, county, or city and county may impose fees in amounts sufficient to pay the costs of preparing, adopting, and implementing a countywide integrated waste management plan prepared pursuant to this division. The fees shall be based on the types or amounts of the solid waste, and shall be used to pay the actual costs incurred by the city or county in preparing, adopting, and implementing the plan, as well as in setting and collecting the local fees. In determining the amounts of the fees, a city or county shall include only those costs directly related to the preparation, adoption, and implementation of the plan and the setting and collection of the local fees. A city, county, or city and county shall impose the fees pursuant to Section 66016 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41902.

A local agency may directly collect the fees authorized by this chapter or may, by agreement, arrange for the fees to be collected by a solid waste hauler providing solid waste collection for the city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41903.

A city or county may assess special fees of a reasonable amount on the importation of waste from outside of the county to publicly owned or privately owned facilities. No city or county shall export solid waste to any other jurisdiction unless the exporting city or county has, within one year following the date specified in Section 41791 or a later date established or permitted by the board, an approved city or county household hazardous waste element and a source reduction and recycling element which have both been implemented, or have submitted a countywide integrated waste management plan, and is in compliance with it, provided, however, that, until one year following the date specified in Section 41791 or a later date established by the board, nothing herein shall be construed as prohibiting the export of solid waste. The board may waive the requirements of this section if the board determines that all additional reasonable source reduction and recycling programs are being implemented in the city or county or if the board determines that the system to export waste supports or enhances the city or county source recovery and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1406, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

41904.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meaning:

(1) “Nonprofit charitable reuser” means a charitable organization, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or a distinct operating unit or division of the charitable organization, that reuses and recycles donated goods or materials and receives more than 50 percent of its revenues from the handling and sale of those donated goods or materials.

(2) “Residue” means the solid waste resulting from the receipt, collection, transportation, sorting, processing, or sale of goods or materials donated to the nonprofit charitable reuser for reuse or recycling, including solid wastes left at collection, processing, or sale sites, but does not include solid wastes resulting from other activities of the nonprofit charitable reuser, such as, but not limited to, the assembly or manufacture of products from new materials, the provision of charitable services such as classroom education, meal preparation, and shelter, or the provision of services for a fee, including solid waste handling services.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares both of the following:

(1) In addition to their service to the poor, disabled, and disadvantaged, charitable organizations provide a valuable service by providing for the reuse or recycling of many articles that otherwise would be disposed of at disposal sites. That reuse or recycling is a leading form of source reduction, which has the highest priority among solid waste management practices identified for California.

(2) The purpose of this section is to authorize local agencies to limit the amount of solid waste handling and disposal fees, as well as any fees authorized by this chapter, for nonprofit charitable reusers to help those nonprofit organizations meet the costs of reusing or recycling donated goods or materials.

(3) The activities of nonprofit charitable reusers that reuse and recycle waste that would otherwise be disposed of assist local agencies in meeting the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(c) (1) A city, county, district, or regional agency may structure its fees for the solid waste handling services or disposal services that it directly provides in a manner that requires nonprofit charitable reusers to pay only the direct costs of handling and disposing of their residue, and exempts them from paying any fee amounts associated with administrative costs to the city, county, district, or regional agency or associated with any other costs that are incurred by the city, county, district, or regional agency pursuant to this division.

(2) A city, county, district, or regional agency may exempt nonprofit charitable reusers from all or part of any fees imposed on the handling or disposal of their residue pursuant to this chapter.

(d) To implement this section, a city, county, district, or regional agency may, by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise, restrict any fee reduction or exemption to specified classes of nonprofit charitable reusers, such as by their size or location, or by the amount, origin, or types of solid waste handled or disposed of, and may require that nonprofit charitable reusers enter into contractual agreements to report the amounts of solid waste disposed of and materials diverted, to maintain specified levels of service and performance, or to perform any activity that the city, county, district, or regional agency may require to achieve the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Unlawful Acts [41950. - 41956.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [41950. - 41956.]

41950.

(a) No person, other than the authorized recycling agent of the city or county, shall remove paper, glass, cardboard, plastic, used motor oil, ferrous metal, aluminum, or other recyclable materials which have been segregated from solid waste materials and placed at a designated recycling collection location for residential curbside collection programs authorized by a city, county, or local agency for the purposes of collection and recycling.

(b) No person shall be subject to an action for a violation of this section, unless the person knows, or reasonably should know, that the materials would otherwise be collected by the authorized recycling agent for residential curbside collection programs authorized by a city, county, or local agency for the purpose of recycling the materials.

(c) From the time that the recyclable materials specified in subdivision (a) are placed for collection at curbside, for a residential curbside collection program authorized by a city, county, or local agency, the recyclable materials are the property of the authorized recycling agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

41951.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “commercial entity” includes a multifamily residential complex.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by contract, paper, glass, cardboard, plastics, used motor oil, ferrous metal, aluminum, and other recyclable materials, which have been segregated from other waste materials, and placed at the designated recycling collection location by any commercial or industrial entity, shall not be removed by anyone other than the authorized recycling agent.

(c) Unless otherwise provided by contract, from the time that the recyclable materials specified in subdivision (b) are placed at the designated recycling location, the recyclable materials are the property of the authorized recycling agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 732, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

41952.

Nothing in this chapter limits the right of any person to donate, sell, or otherwise dispose of his or her recyclable materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41953.

(a) In any civil action by a recycling agent against a person alleged to have violated Section 41950 or 41951, the court may either allow treble damages, as measured by the market value of the recyclable material removed, or award a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, for each unauthorized removal, against the unauthorized person removing the recyclable material.

(b) In any civil action by a recycling agent against a person alleged to have violated Section 41950 or 41951 for a second, or subsequent time, in any 12-month period, the court may either allow treble damages, as measured by the market value of the recyclable material removed, or award a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is greater, for each unauthorized removal against the unauthorized person removing the recyclable material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 732, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

41954.

Nothing in this article limits the authority of a local agency to adopt or enforce regulations or ordinances on the same matters of this article. However, any ordinance which imposes civil penalties shall be approved by a majority vote of the governing board which has proposed adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41955.

If the value of the stolen material is more than fifty dollars ($50), but less than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), a violation of this part may be charged as either a misdemeanor or an infraction. A violation after a second conviction within a 12-month period shall be charged as a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to Section 19 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 53.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

41956.

The board may award special enforcement grants to cities or counties to support pilot programs designed to develop and evaluate enforcement techniques to reduce the theft of recyclable materials from commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential establishments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 732, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. STATE PROGRAMS [42000. - 42999.7.]



  CHAPTER 1. Market Development Programs [42000. - 42025.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42000. - 42002.]

42000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) This division requires cities and counties to divert 25 percent of all solid waste from landfills and transformation facilities by 1995 and 50 percent by 2000. As of 1990, the overall diversion rate in the state was 12 percent.

(b) California’s source reduction, recycling, and composting efforts need to increase greatly if local jurisdictions are to meet the 25-percent and the 50-percent diversion requirements.

(c) Market development is the key to increased, cost-effective recycling. Market development includes activities that strengthen demand by manufacturers and end-use consumers for recyclable materials collected by municipalities, nonprofit organizations, and private entities.

(d) Developing markets for recyclable materials creates opportunities that will reindustrialize California. The board estimates that the development of markets for recyclable materials may create over 20,000 jobs in California’s manufacturing sector, an additional 25,000 jobs in the sorting and processing fields, and an unestimated number of jobs in other fields that may develop through full implementation of this division.

(e) The board is authorized to conduct individual market development activities, but is not presently required to implement a comprehensive plan that addresses the full range of market development needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 672, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the health, safety, and welfare of the people of California depend upon the development, stability, and expansion of domestic markets for the postconsumer wastes and secondary wastes collected within the state. It is therefore the purpose of this chapter to stimulate the use of postconsumer waste materials and secondary waste materials generated in California as raw materials used as feedstock by private business, industry, and commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42002.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Applicant” means a person, as defined in Section 40170, who applies for designation as a Recycling Market Development Zone.

(b) “Postconsumer waste material” means any product generated by a business or a consumer which has served its intended end use, and which has been separated from solid waste for the purposes of collection, recycling, and disposal, and which does not include secondary waste material.

(c) “Recycling-based business” means any business that increases market demand for, or adds value to, postconsumer waste material or secondary waste material.

(d) “Recycling market development zone” or “zone” means any single or joint, contiguous parcels of property that, based on the determination of the board, meets the following criteria:

(1) The area has been zoned an appropriate land use for the development of commercial, industrial, or manufacturing purposes.

(2) The area is identified in the countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan as part of the market development area.

(3) The area is located in a city with an existing postconsumer waste collection infrastructure.

(4) The area may be used to establish commercial, manufacturing, or industrial processes which would produce end products that consist of not less than 50 percent recycled materials.

(e) “Revolving loan program” means the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Program established pursuant to Section 42023.1.

(f) “Secondary waste material” means industrial byproducts which would otherwise go to disposal facilities and wastes generated after completion of a manufacturing process, but does not include internally generated scrap commonly returned to industrial or manufacturing processes, such as home scrap and mill broke.

(g) “Subaccount” means the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42023.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Market Development Plan [42005. - 42009.]

42005.

(a) The board shall develop a comprehensive market development plan using existing resources, that will stimulate market demand in the state for postconsumer waste material and secondary waste material generated in the state.

(b) The board’s market development plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, achieving all of the following goals:

(1) Increasing market demand for postconsumer waste materials and secondary waste materials available due to California’s source reduction and recycling programs.

(2) Increasing demand for recycled content products, especially high quality, value-added products.

(3) Promoting efficient local waste diversion systems which yield high quality, industrially usable feedstocks.

(4) Promoting the competitive collection and use of secondary waste materials.

(c) The board’s development plan shall also include efforts to encourage and promote cooperative, regional programs to expand markets for recycled material. These programs shall include activities to address problems and opportunities that are unique to rural, urban, and suburban areas of the state.

(d) The board shall develop a plan, using existing resources, to provide assistance to local agencies when requested by a city, county, or regional agency, in the implementation of cost-effective programs that provide a quality supply of recycled materials for markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 191.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42005.5.

(a) The department shall, by July 1, 2020, convene a Statewide Commission on Recycling Markets and Curbside Recycling consisting of representatives of public agencies, private solid waste enterprises, and environmental organizations with expertise in recycling.

(b) (1) The commission shall, by July 1, 2021, do both of the following:

(A) Issue policy recommendations to achieve the market development goals established in subdivision (b) of Section 42005 and the state policy goals established in Section 41780.01 of this code and Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Identify products that are recyclable or compostable, as defined pursuant to Section 42370.2, and regularly collected in curbside recycling programs.

(2) The commission shall update the recommendations and identifications made pursuant to paragraph (1) regularly, but not less often than annually.

(3) The commission shall provide an opportunity for the public to review and provide comment before finalizing a policy recommendation or identifying a product pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) The commission shall issue preliminary recommendations on or before January 1, 2021.

(5) The commission may share the recommendations and identifications made pursuant to paragraph (1) with the Legislature or any state or federal agency.

(c) The commission shall provide regular feedback to the department on public messaging designed to encourage proper recycling and to minimize contamination in curbside recycling programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   (AB 2287)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42006.

(a) The plan required by Section 42005 shall describe and prioritize actions that should be undertaken to meet the goals specified in subdivision (b) of Section 42005.

(b) The plan shall include provisions for periodic review and revision in response to changing market factors or actual changes in secondary waste materials markets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42007.

Upon adoption of the plan required by Section 42005, the board shall conduct a detailed analysis of staff resources and consider how to most effectively implement the plan in consideration of existing statutory mandates and resource constraints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42009.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to infringe upon regulations relating to civil rights, equal employment rights, equal opportunity rights, or fair housing rights of any person or any environmental protection or public health law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Market Development Zone Program [42010. - 42025.]

42010.

(a) The local governing body may, either by ordinance or resolution, upon the recommendation of the appropriate land use planning agency, propose eligible parcels of property within its jurisdiction as a recycling market development zone.

(b) The proposal of a recycling market development zone shall be based upon the following findings by the local governing body:

(1) The current waste management practices and conditions are favorable to the development of postconsumer waste material markets.

(2) The designation as a recycling market development zone is necessary to assist in attracting private sector recycling investments to the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

42012.

The local governing body, or any person through the local governing body, may apply to the department for designation as a recycling market development zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 27.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42013.

The department shall adopt regulations and guidelines concerning the necessary contents of each application for designation and, in the countywide integrated waste management plans, shall determine the maximum number of recycling market development zones to be designated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 28.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42014.

The department may designate or redesignate recycling market development zones for persons applying for that designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 29.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42019.

In evaluating an application for the designation of a recycling market development zone, the department shall consider the amount of landfill capacity remaining in the jurisdiction where the zone would be located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 34.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42020.

In evaluating an application for the designation of a recycling market development zone, the department shall not deny the application solely because of technical deficiencies. The department shall provide applicants with an opportunity to correct technical deficiencies. An application shall be denied if technical deficiencies are not corrected within 14 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 35.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit the authority of local governments to make land use decisions within their jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.1.

(a) The Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount is hereby created in the account for the purpose of providing loans for purposes of the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Program established pursuant to this article and for making payments pursuant to subdivision (g).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys deposited into the subaccount are hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal year for making loans pursuant to this article and for making payments pursuant to subdivision (g).

(c) The department may expend interest earnings on moneys in the subaccount for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out the
 Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Program, upon the appropriation of moneys in the subaccount for that purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(d) The moneys from loan repayments and fees, including, but not limited to, principal and interest repayments, fees and points, recovery of collection costs, income earned on an asset recovered pursuant to a loan default, and funds collected through foreclosure actions shall be deposited into the subaccount.

(e) All interest accruing on interest payments from loan applicants shall be deposited into the subaccount.

(f) The department may expend the moneys in the subaccount to make loans to local governing bodies, private businesses, and nonprofit entities within recycling market development zones, or in areas outside zones where making the loan will benefit a local
 jurisdiction or assist a local jurisdiction in complying with Section 40051.

(g) The department may expend the moneys in the subaccount to make payments to local governing bodies within a recycling market zone for services related to the promotion of the zone. The services may include, but are not limited to, training, outreach, development of written promotional materials, and technical analyses of feedstock availability.

(h) The department shall not fund a loan until it determines that the applicant has obtained all significant applicable federal, state, and local permits. The department shall determine which applicable federal, state, and local permits are significant.

(i) The department shall establish and collect fees for applications for loans authorized by this section. The application fee shall be set at a
 level that is sufficient to fund the department’s cost of processing applications for loans. In addition, the department shall establish a schedule of fees or points for loans that are entered into by the department, to fund the department’s administration of the revolving loan program.

(j) The department may expend moneys in the subaccount for the administration of the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Program, upon the appropriation of moneys in the subaccount for that purpose in the annual Budget Act. In addition, the department may expend moneys in the account to administer the revolving loan program, upon the appropriation of moneys in the account for that purpose in the annual Budget Act. However, funding for the administration of the revolving loan program from the account shall be provided only if there are not sufficient moneys in the subaccount to fully fund the administration of the program.

(k) The department, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47901, may set aside moneys for the purposes of paying costs necessary to protect the state’s position as a lender-creditor. These costs shall be broadly construed to include, but not be limited to, foreclosure expenses, auction fees, title searches, appraisals, real estate brokerage fees, attorney’s fees, mortgage payments, insurance payments, utility costs, repair costs, removal and storage costs for repossessed equipment and inventory, and additional expenditures to purchase a senior lien in foreclosure or bankruptcy proceedings.

(l) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the date on which it becomes
 inoperative and is repealed.

(2) The repeal of this section pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not extinguish any loan obligation or the authority of the state to pursue appropriate actions for the collection of a loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 37.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.2.

(a) Upon authorization by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, the Controller shall transfer a sum, as available, from the account to the subaccount as necessary to meet anticipated loan demand under the program.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the date on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(2) (A) The repeal of this section pursuant to paragraph (1) shall
 not extinguish any loan obligation or the authority of the state to pursue appropriate actions for the collection of a loan.

(B) The department shall not be obligated to pay interest on the amount appropriated from the account to the subaccount pursuant to subdivision (a). This subparagraph shall apply retroactively from January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 9.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.3.

(a) All money remaining in the subaccount on July 1, 2031, and all money received as repayment and interest on loans shall, as of July 1, 2031, be transferred to the account and any money due and outstanding on loans as of July 1, 2031, shall be repaid to the department and deposited by the department in the account until paid in full, except that, upon authorization by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, interest earnings may be expended for administrative costs associated with the collection of outstanding loan accounts.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is
 repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(2) The repeal of this section pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not extinguish any loan obligation or the authority of the state to pursue appropriate actions for the collection of a loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 10.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.4.

(a) A loan made pursuant to Section 42023.1 shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) The terms of an approved loan shall be specified in a loan agreement between the borrower and the department. The loan agreement shall include a requirement that the failure to comply with the agreement shall result in any remaining unpaid amount of the loan, with accrued interest, being immediately due and payable. Notwithstanding any term of the agreement, a recipient of a loan that the department approves shall repay the principal amount, plus interest. The department shall establish the loan interest rate as low as possible to make projects feasible and post the interest rate on its internet website. All money received as repayment and interest on loans made